Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 25
PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS

Cross references:

For public improvements, see also article 20 of title 30; for Colorado labor on public works, see article 17 of title 8; for public works contractor's bond, see article 26 of title 38; for the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

hoice of Entity: Using Limited Purpose Local Governments to Solve Problems", see 38

C

olo. Law. 59 (Oct. 2009).

Section

PART 1 URBAN RENEWAL

PART 2 PARKS - CITIES

PART 3 PARKS - TOWNS

PART 4 PUBLIC MALL ACT OF 1970

PART 5 SPECIAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS
IN MUNICIPALITIES

PART 6 IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS
IN MUNICIPALITIES (1949 ACT)

PART 7 CEMETERIES

PART 8 DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITIES

PART 9 ESTABLISHMENT OF PUBLIC
AUTHORITIES BY MUNICIPALITIES -
ENERGY RESOURCES

PART 10 FUNDING DEFICIENCIES

PART 11 FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS

PART 12 BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

PART 13 PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT - MUNICIPAL CONTRACTS